Washington statutes.
RCW 13.06.010

Intention.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1391-S2.SL) ***

It is the intention of the legislature in enacting this chapter to increase the protection afforded the citizens of this state, to require community planning, to provide necessary services and supervision for juvenile offenders in the community when appropriate, to reduce reliance on state-operated correctional institutions for offenders whose standard range disposition does not include commitment of the offender to the department, and to encourage the community to efficiently and effectively provide community services to juvenile offenders through consolidation of service delivery systems.

[1983 c 191 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 165 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 165: "This act shall become effective on July 1, 1969." [1969 ex.s. c 165 s 7.]